Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.278

Select committee on pension policy—Subcommittees.

(1) The select committee on pension policy may form three function-specific subcommittees, as set forth under subsection (2) of this section, from the members under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e), as follows:

(a) A public safety subcommittee with one member from each group under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e);

(b) An education subcommittee with one member from each group under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e); and

(c) A state and local government subcommittee, with one retiree member under RCW 41.04.276(1)(d) and two members from each group under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (c) and (e).

The retiree members may serve on more than one subcommittee to ensure representation on each subcommittee.

(2)(a) The public safety subcommittee shall focus on pension issues affecting public safety employees who are members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters', public safety employees', and Washington state patrol retirement systems.

(b) The education subcommittee shall focus on pension issues affecting educational employees who are members of the public employees', teachers', and school employees' retirement systems.

(c) The state and local government subcommittee shall focus on pension issues affecting state and local government employees who are members of the public employees' retirement system.

[ 2006 c 309 s 4; 2003 c 295 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 309: See note following RCW 41.37.005.